Hawaii statutes.
§667-63 Notice to
mortgage creditors. (a)
A mortgage creditor having a mortgage lien on a time share interest who desires
notice that another mortgage creditor having a mortgage lien on the time share
interest intends to foreclose and sell the mortgaged time share interest, pursuant to the power of sale under section 667-62, may submit a
written request to the mortgagee who is foreclosing or
who may foreclose the mortgage by power of sale, asking to receive notice of the mortgagee's intention to foreclose the
mortgage under section 667-62. The request for notice:

(1) May be submitted any time after the
recordation of the subject mortgage; provided that the request is submitted prior to completion of publication of notice of the
intention to foreclose the mortgage and of the sale of the mortgaged time share
interest;

(2) Shall be signed by the mortgage creditor
desiring to receive notice, or its authorized representative; and

(3) Shall specify the name and address of
the person to whom the notice is to be mailed.

(b) The mortgagee receiving
the request shall thereafter give notice to all mortgage creditors who have
timely submitted their request. The notice shall be sent by mail or otherwise
communicated to the mortgage creditors not less than seven calendar days prior
to the day of sale.

(c) No request for a copy of
any notice pursuant to this section nor any statement or allegation in any such
request nor any record thereof shall affect the title to the time share
interest or be deemed notice to any person that any party requesting copy of
the notice has or claims any right, title, or interest in, or lien or charge
upon the time share interest described in the mortgage referred to therein. [L
2005, c 82, pt of §1; am L
2012, c 182, §35]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next